Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.080

Appeal from denial of educational program.

Where a child with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020 has been denied the opportunity of a special educational program by a local school district there shall be a right of appeal by the parent or guardian of such child to the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to procedures established by the superintendent and in accordance with RCW 28A.155.090 and part B of the federal individuals with disabilities education improvement act.

[ 2007 c 115 s 10; 1995 c 77 s 14; 1990 c 33 s 126; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.13.060.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.